Illinois, session 104th, HB1121.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 4-14.1 and 5-9.1 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/4-14.1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 4-14.1)7    Sec. 4-14.1. Cancelation of deceased voter's registration. 8Upon establishment of an electronic reporting system for death 9registrations as provided in the Vital Records Act, the county 10clerk of the county where a decedent last resided, as 11indicated on the decedent's death certificate, shall may issue 12certifications of death records from that system and shall may 13use that system to cancel the registration of any person who 14has died during the preceding month. Regardless of whether or 15not such a system has been established, it is the duty of the 16county clerk to examine, monthly, the records deposited in his 17or her office pursuant to the Vital Records Act that relate to 18deaths in the county, and to cancel the registration of any 19person who has died during the preceding month.20(Source: P.A. 96-1484, eff. 1-1-11.) 21    (10 ILCS 5/5-9.1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 5-9.1)22    Sec. 5-9.1. Cancelation of deceased voter's registration.   HB1121- 2 -LRB104 05511 SPS 15540 b1Upon establishment of an electronic reporting system for death 2registrations as provided in the Vital Records Act, the county 3clerk of the county where a decedent last resided, as 4indicated on the decedent's death certificate, shall may issue 5certifications of death records from that system and shall may 6use that system to cancel the registration of any person who 7has died during the preceding month and cause the name of each 8such deceased person to be erased from the register of the 9precinct in which the deceased person was registered. 10Regardless of whether or not such a system has been 11established, it is the duty of the county clerk to examine 12monthly the records deposited in his or her office pursuant to 13the Vital Records Act that relate to deaths in the county, to 14cancel the registration of any person who has died during the 15preceding month and cause the name of each such deceased 16person to be erased from the register of the precinct in which 17the deceased person was registered.18(Source: P.A. 96-1484, eff. 1-1-11.)